Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 229 Boxing and Wrestling

229.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

229.011.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the following definitions shall apply:

“Advertise” means the use of handbills, placards, posters, billboards, pictures, printed or written material or newspapers or other publications, or radio, television, Internet, and other communication media;

“Boxing” means a contest or exhibition in which a person delivers blows with the fist that may be reasonably expected to disable or inflict injury and in which boxers compete for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators;

“Commission” means the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission;

“Exhibition” means an event or engagement:

In which the participants show or display their skills without necessarily striving to win; or

That involves amateurs not under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky High School Athletic Association, the National Collegiate Athletic Association, the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics, the Amateur Athletic Union, Golden Gloves, USA Boxing, USA Wrestling, or a public show to which an admission ticket is required, or other charge is made, or invitation;

“Kickboxing” means a boxing contest or exhibition where the participants are allowed to throw kicks or foot blows at the opponent in addition to punching with the hands and in which kickboxers compete for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators;

“Mixed martial arts” means any form of unarmed contest or exhibition in which participants compete for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators. Mixed martial arts may include any element or combination of elements of boxing, kickboxing, wrestling, or other martial arts. Exhibitions where participants are judged on form and style and where punches and kicks are pulled shall not be included in this definition;

“Muay thai” means a boxing contest or exhibition where the participants are allowed combined use of clinches, elbows, knees, and shins in addition to punching with the hands and in which participants compete for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or club;

“Show” means any boxing, kickboxing, mixed martial arts, muay thai, or wrestling match, contest, or exhibition coming under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission;

“Unarmed combat” means boxing, kickboxing, sparring, wrestling, mixed martial arts, or muay thai under the jurisdiction of the commission; and

“Wrestling” means an activity or performance of athletic and wrestling skill between individuals who are not under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky High School Athletic Association, the National Collegiate Athletic Association, the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics, or USA Wrestling in which the participants struggle hand-to-hand primarily for the purpose of providing entertainment to spectators rather than conducting a bona fide athletic contest. The outcome of these matches may be predetermined. Participating wrestlers may not be required to use their best efforts in order to win.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 1; 2005, ch. 11, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Persons who conducted a private showing of the Clay-Liston match through the medium of closed circuit television were required to have an annual license, to pay the commission 5% of the gross receipts from the sale of all tickets, and to post bond in the sum of $2,000.

OAG 65-414

.

The Joe Martin for sheriff campaign committee is both an association and a club and is therefore a “person” within the meaning of former
KRS

229.071

and can be licensed by the Kentucky Athletic Commission to conduct boxing matches; in addition, there being no statutory exemption for political action committees, the Joe Martin for sheriff campaign committee is liable for the payment of the gross receipts tax the same as any other licensed promoter.

OAG 80-435

.

Since former subsection (2) of this section defined a wrestling or boxing exhibition to include “a public show or showing through the medium of closed circuit television to which an admission ticket is required, or other charge is made,”

OAG 80-447

is hereby modified to conform with

OAG 65-414

to the extent that a promoter is required to obtain a license and permit in order to conduct a closed circuit television wrestling or boxing exhibition.

OAG 81-217

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bribery of participants in sports events prohibited, KRS

518.040

,

518.050

.

229.015.
Boxing Commissioner. [Repealed.]

229.020.
Participating in, aiding in and attending unlicensed fights prohibited. [Repealed.]

229.021.
License required for shows and exhibitions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 10; 2005, ch. 11, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.025.
Administrative regulations — License requirement — License fees — License age requirement.

Every licensee shall be subject to the administrative regulations promulgated by the commission.

No person shall participate in an unarmed combat show in any capacity without holding a license issued by the commission.

The commission shall establish through the promulgation of administrative regulations:

All license types, the eligibility requirements for each license type, and the expiration date of each license type;

The annual license fee, which shall be no greater than:

Five hundred dollars ($500) for promoter licenses; and

Fifty dollars ($50) for all other licenses; and

The method for submitting all applications for licensure.

No contestant under eighteen (18) years of age shall be knowingly issued a license or allowed to participate in any unarmed combat shows, nor shall any person obtain, or cause to be obtained, a license for any person under eighteen (18) years of age to participate in any unarmed combat show, except through a sanctioning body authorized by KRS

229.045

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 70, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

229.030.
Officers to suppress unlicensed fights. [Repealed.]

229.031.
Report as to tickets sold and receipts — Tax on gross receipts — Notification when supplying broadcast facilities — Examination of books and records.

Every person conducting an unarmed combat show, other than those holding a permit under subsection (1) of KRS

229.061

, shall furnish to the commission a written report, verified by the person, if an individual, or by some officer, if a corporation or association, showing the number of tickets sold for the show, the amount of the gross receipts from this sale, and any other matters prescribed by the commission. He or she shall also pay to the commission a tax of twenty-five dollars ($25) or five percent (5%) of the gross receipts from the sale of all tickets to the show, whichever is greater.

Any person supplying radio, television, or cable facilities for the broadcast or televising of any show shall, prior to the show, notify the commission.

All taxes required to be paid by this section shall be computed on the gross receipts without any deduction for commissions, brokerage, distribution fees, advertising, or other related expenses, charges, or recoupments, except that federal excise taxes may be deducted.

Whenever a person fails to make the report within the time prescribed by the commission, or whenever the report is incomplete or patently inaccurate, the commission may examine or cause to be examined the books and records of that person to ascertain the total amount of its gross receipts for any show to determine the amount of tax due.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 15; 2005, ch. 11, § 17, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 168, § 155, effective March 18, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A municipality must pay the five percent gross receipts tax, and said tax is in lieu of the payment of admission taxes.

OAG 71-471

.

“Gross receipts” includes everything that a promoter takes in and no deduction should be made for a bond fee that was included in the price of admission.

OAG 78-734

.

The Joe Martin for sheriff campaign committee is both an association and a club and is therefore a “person” within the meaning of former
KRS

229.071

and can be licensed by the Kentucky Athletic Commission to conduct boxing matches; in addition, there being no statutory exemption for political action committees, the Joe Martin for sheriff campaign committee is liable for the payment of the gross receipts tax the same as any other licensed promoter.

OAG 80-435

.

229.035.
Promoter license requirement — Approval of show dates — Bond.

No person shall conduct or advertise a show without a promoter license issued by the commission to conduct the show. Show dates shall be approved as determined through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

Any person applying for a promoter license shall file with the commission a bond in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to be approved as to form and the sufficiency of the sureties by the commission, conditioned for the payment of:

Taxes;

Fines;

Fees imposed by the commission;

Purses and money owed to contestants; and

Money owed to judges, physicians, referees, timekeepers, or other contracted event service providers.

If the promoter’s bond expires or is cancelled, the commission shall immediately terminate that promoter’s license.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 70, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

229.040.
Commissioner to control and license matches or exhibitions; may revoke licenses and subpoena witnesses. [Repealed.]

229.041.
Books examined, when. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 16; 2005, ch. 11, § 18, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.045.
Sanctioning bodies — Requirements — Administrative regulation.

USA Boxing is the only sanctioning body recognized to conduct combat sports not covered under this chapter.

All other sanctioning bodies shall be nonprofit and submit a request to the commission to be recognized as a sanctioning body according to the requirements the commission establishes through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 70, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

229.050.
Residents only may conduct matches or exhibitions. [Repealed.]

229.051.
Bond of licensee — Condition. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 14; 1982, ch. 233, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 11, § 16, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.055.
Rounds limitation of boxing, kickboxing, or muay thai contest or exhibition — Boxing show contracts to be filed with commission before show.

A boxing, kickboxing, or muay thai contest or exhibition shall not consist of more than twelve (12) rounds. The duration of the rounds shall be determined by the commission through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

Prior to any boxing show, the promoter shall file with the commission a copy of each contract involving compensation of the contestants and a copy of each contract under which he or she will receive, directly or indirectly, compensation from any source. Any person making payments under any of these contracts shall promptly report to the commission the amount of these payments.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 70, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

229.060.
License subject to commissioner’s regulations; application for. [Repealed.]

229.061.
Permits for schools and charitable organizations.

The commission may issue a permit, without the payment of any taxes or license fee, to any accredited college, university, school, Young Men’s Christian Association, Young Men’s Hebrew Association, or organization that in the judgment of the commission is of like character, to hold an unarmed combat show upon a sufficient showing that the matches or exhibitions are to be held by and between bona fide students or members of the accredited colleges, universities, schools, Young Men’s Christian Associations, Young Men’s Hebrew Associations, or organizations that in the judgment of the commission are of like character.

Any regularly organized post of the American Legion, and any organization operating solely for charitable purposes from which no individual, partnership, or corporation derives any monetary gain, may hold an unarmed combat show without the payment of the license fee prescribed by KRS

229.025

. Any post of the American Legion or other organization holding shows under this section shall be subject to KRS

229.031

.

No show authorized by subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be conducted without a permit to hold the specific match and accompanying program of events at a specified location on a specified date.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 13; 1992, ch. 286, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 11, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The only document which the commission is authorized to issue regarding amateur boxing or wrestling matches or exhibitions is a permit to hold the event, but before issuing a permit to hold a match or exhibition sanctioned by the A.A.U. the commission should first receive a copy of the sanction.

OAG 77-253

.

The commission cannot govern or control amateur bouts which are sanctioned by the A.A.U., for the commission’s only authority is to issue permits to hold matches and exhibitions.

OAG 77-253

.

Because it is not the duty of the commission to regulate amateur boxing and wrestling, it is not the responsibility of the commission to license or select the officials.

OAG 79-55

.

229.065.
Licenses required for wrestling training.

No person shall provide training or instruction for any wrestling show without holding a promoter license granted by the commission.

No person shall train as a wrestler without being licensed by the commission.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 70, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

229.070.
License fee. [Repealed.]

229.071.
License requirement for shows and exhibitions — Fees — License preference to Kentucky residents. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 7; 1982, ch. 233, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 184, § 1, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 286, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 11, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 7, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.080.
Exemptions from tax or license — Special permit. [Repealed.]

229.081.
License and eligibility requirements for participants in show. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 8; 1990, ch. 184, § 2, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 286, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 106, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 11, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 8, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.090.
Bond to be filed before license granted. [Repealed.]

229.091.
Licensees subject to regulation — Written application. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 9; 1992, ch. 286, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 11, § 12, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.100.
Report and tax on match or exhibition. [Repealed.]

229.101.
Length of bouts, exhibitions, and rounds. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 17; 2000, ch. 106, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 91, § 9, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.110.
Commissioner may fix tax if report is unsatisfactory or not made. [Repealed.]

229.111.
Health examination of contestants.

Contestants in a boxing, kickboxing, muay thai, or mixed martial arts show shall be examined by a reputable licensed physician appointed by the commission, and shall meet the health and fitness requirements as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the commission before participating in a boxing, kickboxing, muay thai, or mixed martial arts show.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 18; 1992, ch. 286, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 106, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 11, § 20, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 10, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

229.120.
Length of match or exhibition. [Repealed.]

229.121.
Age limit for contestants. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 21; 2008, ch. 91, § 11, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.130.
Examination of contestants required. [Repealed.]

229.131.
Decisions rendered, how — Administrative regulations.

Decisions may be rendered in any unarmed combat show permitted by this chapter in the discretion of the commission and by any method it prescribes through the promulgation of administrative regulations.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 19; 2005, ch. 11, § 21, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 12, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

229.140.
Decisions rendered as commissioner prescribes. [Repealed.]

229.141.
Structures used for unarmed combat shows, requirements.

All structures or parts of structures used, or intended to be used, for an unarmed combat show shall conform to any building codes, safety codes, and local laws that apply to the structure or the location and use of the structure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 20; 2008, ch. 91, § 13, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

229.150.
Structures used for matches or exhibitions — Regulations. [Repealed.]

229.151.
Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission — Membership — Officers — Compensation — Expenses — Quorum.

The Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission is hereby created and established as an agency of state government charged with the responsibility for regulatory oversight and the establishment of sound policies and procedures governing the conduct of unarmed combat within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The commission shall be organized within the Public Protection Cabinet.

The commission shall consist of the following five (5) members:

The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet, or the secretary’s designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, voting member; and

Four (4) members who shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:

One (1) member shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in Kentucky;

One (1) member shall be an attorney licensed to practice law in Kentucky;

One (1) member shall have experience in sports marketing or promotion; and

At least one (1) member shall have no financial interest in the business or industry regulated.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member to serve as the commission’s chairperson. The Governor shall further designate a second member to serve as vice chairperson with authority to act in the absence of the chairperson or if the office of the chairperson is vacant.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The appointed members of the commission shall serve for a term of three (3) years. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Members of the commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each meeting attended and shall be reimbursed for all expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 2; 1978, ch. 154, § 22, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 286, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 194, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 11, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 14, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 441, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 70, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Upon review of this section and KRS

64.640

, as well as of KRS

18A.350

,

18A.355

, and

18A.360

(now repealed), the incumbents of the Athletic Commission are included under the language of KRS

18A.350

which defines employee as any officer or employee of the executive branch of government; therefore, it would appear that the members of the Athletic Commission are eligible for annual increments, although it is entirely possible that this was not the intent of the legislature.

OAG 90-25

.

229.155.
Executive director — Duties — Interagency agreements.

To carry out the functions relating to the commission’s duties and responsibilities and to afford the full experience and resources of the Public Protection Cabinet, the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet may appoint an executive director pursuant to KRS

12.050

. The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet or the secretary’s designee shall act as executive director in the absence of the executive director.

The executive director shall employ sufficient regulatory staff for the commission that shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the commission, including but not limited to the following:

Complying with administrative regulations;

Issuing licenses and permits;

Establishing appropriate organizational structures;

Carrying out policy and program directives of the commission; and

Performing all other duties and responsibilities as assigned.

With approval of the commission, the executive director and regulatory staff may enter into agreements with any state agency or political subdivision of the state, any postsecondary education institution, or any other person or entity to enlist assistance to implement the duties and responsibilities of the commission.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 11, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 16, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 442, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 70, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

229.160.
Sham matches or exhibitions prohibited. [Repealed.]

229.161.
Other officers, employees, and inspectors. [Repealed.]

229.170.
Contestant under eighteen not to participate in professional match. [Repealed.]

229.171.
Commission to control and manage unarmed combat shows — Administrative regulations — Development of regulatory programs and procedures.

The commission is vested with the sole direction, management, control, and jurisdiction over all unarmed combat shows to be conducted, held, or given within the Commonwealth. The commission is hereby given the sole control, authority, and jurisdiction over all licenses to:

Hold unarmed combat shows for prizes or purses or where an admission fee or donation is received, or a ticket or invitation is required to attend; and

Participate in the unarmed combat shows.

The commission may promulgate administrative regulations it considers necessary or expedient for the performance of its functions provided in this chapter. In recognition of the fact that more supervision is desirable in this area, it is the intention of the General Assembly to confer upon the commission wider discretion than that ordinarily possessed by administrative agencies.

The commission shall be responsible for the following:

Developing programs and procedures that will aggressively fulfill its oversight and regulatory role, with full accountability and internal controls to protect athletes in the ring;

Adhering to the best regulatory practices and due process procedures to protect the regulated community and the interests of the Commonwealth, and ensuring that all education and training requirements for hearing officers and members serving as hearing officers under KRS Chapter 13B are met;

Developing the Commonwealth’s goals of providing the professional staff necessary to ensure that events are effectively regulated, while allowing commission members to provide the policy oversight necessary to protect the integrity of the regulatory program; and

Recommending changes to statutory and regulatory authorities to best protect athletes, while Promoting Kentucky as a world-class market for major events.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 5; 1992, ch. 286, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 11, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 17, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

229.180.
Authority’s rules and administrative regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 6; 2005, ch. 11, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 18, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.190.
Appeals — Hearings.

Any action of the commission, including any action of a commission employee, taken under KRS

229.200

may be appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. The commission may provide for hearing officers or impanel not less than three (3) of its members to conduct hearings.

Any party aggrieved by a final order of the commission may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 4; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 212, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 286, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 148, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 11, § 15, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 70, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

229.200.
Suspension, reprimand, revocation, probation, or refusal of licenses — Grounds — Penalties for violation of chapter.

The commission may suspend, reprimand, revoke, probate, or refuse to renew or issue a license if it has reason to believe the licensee or applicant has:

Violated any provision of this chapter;

Violated any administrative regulation promulgated by the commission pursuant to this chapter;

Been found guilty of, entered a plea of guilty or no contest to, or entered an Alford plea to a crime, other than a traffic violation, that is detrimental to the interests of unarmed combat or to the public interest, convenience, or necessity in any jurisdiction;

Been found liable in a civil action for any claim that involves fraud or dishonesty in any jurisdiction if the person is a licensed promoter, manager, referee, or judge;

Violated a law related to boxing, kickboxing, sparring, mixed martial arts, muay thai, or wrestling in any jurisdiction;

Placed a bet or wager on any bout or match in which the person participates or works;

Served as, or consorted or associated with any person who is, a bookmaker or illegal gambler;

Participated in an unlicensed event;

Declared bankruptcy if the person is a licensed promoter, manager, referee, or judge; or

An injury or health condition that makes it unsafe for the person to participate.

If the commission has reason to believe that a person has committed a violation of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, the commission may impose one (1) or more of the following penalties:

Issue a cease and desist order;

Declare a contestant ineligible to compete or disqualify the contestant;

Eject the person from the premises at which the show or exhibition is taking place;

Issue a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000);

Suspend, reprimand, revoke, probate, or refuse to renew or issue a license; or

Refer the person for criminal prosecution.

The commission may delegate to its employees the ability to take any of the actions authorized by subsection (2) of this section, subject to the appellate rights granted in KRS

229.190

.

For any act that would justify the suspension of a license, other than a medical suspension, the commission may declare the person who committed the act ineligible to receive a license for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 11; 1992, ch. 286, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 11, § 13, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 19, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 158, § 40, effective June 29, 2017; repealed and reenacted by 2017 ch. 70, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was repealed and reenacted by
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 70, sec. 16 and amended by
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 158, sec. 40 Pursuant to KRS

446.260

, the repeal and reenactment in
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 70, sec. 16 prevails.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky athletic commission has authority over the ticket sellers, doormen and other personnel at closed circuit television shows as it does in the case of other live matches and exhibitions.

OAG 80-447

.

229.210.
Medical suspension — Other ineligibility duration. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 12; 2005, ch. 11, § 14, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 20, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 12; 2005, ch. 11, § 14, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 20, effective July 15, 2008) was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

229.220.
Appeal to full commission — Procedure — Judicial review. [Repealed.]

229.230.
Final decisions of full commission not suspended pending appeal. [Repealed.]

229.240.
Peace officers to prevent unauthorized shows.

All peace officers, who are informed or who have reason to believe that a show in violation of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with this chapter is taking place or will be taking place within their jurisdiction, shall suppress and prevent it. For this purpose any peace officer may enter any place where a show is being or will be held or where there is training or preparation for a wrestling show and may arrest without a warrant any person who does not submit satisfactory proof that he or she has the license or permit required by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 22; 2000, ch. 106, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 91, § 21, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.

229.250.
Disbursal of fees and charges collected by Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.

The fees and charges collected by the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a separate revolving or trust and agency fund account established for the purpose of administrating this chapter. The cost and expenses of administering this chapter, including compensation to members of the commission, its officers, and employees shall be paid out of the State Treasury upon warrants of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet according to law. The total expense of administering this chapter shall not exceed the fees and other charges collected by the commission and available in the revolving or trust and agency fund account.

All fees and charges collected by the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission shall be available for the administration of this chapter, and for no other purpose.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 404, § 31, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 11, § 19, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 22, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 18, effective June 29, 2017.

229.260.
Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission Medical Advisory Panel — Membership — Compensation — Duties — Conduct of meetings.

The Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission Medical Advisory Panel is hereby created and established as an agency of state government.

The panel shall consist of three (3) to five (5) physicians appointed by the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet.

At least one (1) of the panel members shall be a neurologist.

In addition to the physicians appointed to the panel under this subsection, the licensed physician appointed to the commission by the Governor under KRS

229.151

shall be an ex officio voting member of the panel and shall serve as the panel’s chairperson.

Each physician shall be:

Licensed to practice medicine in Kentucky; and

Knowledgeable regarding one (1) or more medical fields related to the kinds and types of injuries or conditions likely to be the result of unarmed combat.

Each member of the panel shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each meeting of the panel and for each day that the member is engaged in carrying out the duties of the panel.

The panel shall advise the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission regarding:

Health and safety issues and policy relating to the sports regulated by the commission;

The fitness of an individual referred to the panel for review to compete in the regulated sports; and

The length of a medical suspension of an injured person.

Meetings of the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Medical Advisory Panel held for the purpose of discussing an individual’s fitness to obtain a license or to compete shall be exempt from the Kentucky Open Meetings Law established in KRS Chapter 61.

Meetings of the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Medical Advisory Panel for the purpose of discussing individual fitness to obtain a license or to compete may be held in the form of written, video, telephonic, or electronic communications between members. The members shall not be compensated for these meetings.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 91, § 15, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 70, § 19, effective June 29, 2017.

229.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

229.991.
Penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 170, § 25; 2000, ch. 106, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 11, § 22, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 91, § 23, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 70, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.